Washington statutes.
RCW 18.180.030

Identification of process server on proof of service.

(1) A process server required to register under RCW 18.180.010 shall indicate the process server's registration number and the process server's county of registration on any proof of service the process server signs.

(2) Employees of a process server required to register under RCW 18.180.010 shall indicate the employer's registration number and the employer's county of registration on any proof of service the registrant's employee signs.

[ 1992 c 125 s 4.]